Massachusetts, session 194th, H3591.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Because the state has a financial responsibility in promoting public education, and 
because the public library is a vital agency serving all levels of the educational process, it is 
hereby declared to be the policy of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts to encourage the 
improvement of free public libraries and all public library systems, to facilitate cooperation 
among all types of libraries in promoting the sharing of public library resources, including digital 
resources.  
It is further declared to be the policy of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts to 
encourage and protect the freedom of public libraries and public library systems to acquire 
materials without external limitations and to be protected against attempts to ban, remove, or 
otherwise restrict access to books or other materials. 

of 3 11  The Massachusetts Board of Library Commissioners shall administer the provisions of 
this Act and shall prescribe such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry the provisions of 
this Act into effect. 
The rules and regulations established by the Massachusetts Board of Library 
Commissioners for the administration of this Act shall be designed to achieve the following 
standards and objectives: 
A. Provide public library service for every person in the commonwealth by extending 
public library facilities to areas not now served. 
B. Provide library materials for student needs at every educational level. 
C. Provide adequate library materials to satisfy the reference and research needs of all 
people of this Commonwealth. 
D. Provide an adequate staff of professionally trained librarians for the Commonwealth. 
E. Adopt the American Library Association's Library Bill of Rights that indicates 
materials should not be proscribed or removed because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval or, in 
the alternative, develop a written statement declaring the inherent authority of the public library 
or public library system to provide an adequate collection stock of books and other materials 
sufficient in size and varied in kind and subject matter to satisfy the library needs and interests of 
all people of this Commonwealth and prohibit the practice of banning specific books or 
resources. 
F.  Provide adequate public library outlets and facilities that are convenient in time and 
place to serve the people of this Commonwealth. 

of 3 32  G. Encourage existing and new public libraries to develop library systems serving a 
sufficiently large population to support adequate library service at a reasonable cost. 
H. Foster the economic and efficient utilization of public funds to improve public 
libraries and library systems in the Commonwealth. 
The Massachusetts State Advisory Council on Libraries (SACL) shall confer with, 
advise, and make recommendations to the Massachusetts Board of Library Commissioners 
regarding any matter under this Act, particularly regarding the formation of public library 
systems. 
This Act shall take effect upon passage.